Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 8
General Provisions

§ 15-2-801. Renunciation.

A person or the representative of an incapacitated or unascertained person who is an heir, devisee, person succeeding to a renounced interest, donee, beneficiary under a testamentary or nontestamentary instrument, donee of a power of appointment, grantee, surviving joint owner or surviving joint tenant, beneficiary of an insurance contract, person designated to take pursuant to a power of appointment exercised by a testamentary or nontestamentary instrument, or otherwise the recipient of any benefit under a testamentary or nontestamentary instrument, may renounce in whole or in part, powers, future interests, specific parts, fractional shares or assets thereof by filing a written instrument within the time and at the place hereinafter provided.
(1)(a) A person or the representative of an incapacitated or unascertained person who is an heir, devisee, person succeeding to a renounced interest, donee, beneficiary under a testamentary or nontestamentary instrument, donee of a power of appointment, grantee, surviving joint owner or surviving joint tenant, beneficiary of an insurance contract, person designated to take pursuant to a power of appointment exercised by a testamentary or nontestamentary instrument, or otherwise the recipient of any benefit under a testamentary or nontestamentary instrument, may renounce in whole or in part, powers, future interests, specific parts, fractional shares or assets thereof by filing a written instrument within the time and at the place hereinafter provided.

The instrument shall:

Describe the property or interest renounced;

Be signed by the person renouncing; and

Declare the renunciation and the extent thereof.

The appropriate court may direct or permit a trustee under a testamentary or nontestamentary instrument to renounce or to deviate from any power of administration, management or allocation of benefit upon finding that exercise of such power may defeat or impair the accomplishment of the purposes of the trust whether by the imposition of tax or the allocation of beneficial interest inconsistent with such purposes. Such authority shall be exercised after hearing and upon notice to all known persons beneficially interested in such trust or estate, in the manner pursuant to part 4, chapter 1, title 15, Idaho Code.

Except as provided in subsection (9) of [the] this section, the writing specified in subsection (1) of this section must be filed within nine (9) months after the transfer or the death of the decedent, or donee of the power, whichever is the later, or, if the taker of the property is not then finally ascertained, not later than nine (9) months after the event that determines that the taker of the property or interest is finally ascertained or his interest indefeasibly vested. The writing must be filed in the court of the county where proceedings concerning the decedent’s estate are pending, or where they would be pending if commenced. If an interest in real estate is renounced, a copy of the writing may also be recorded in the office of the recorder in the county in which said real estate lies. A copy of the writing also shall be delivered in person or mailed by registered or certified mail to the personal representative of the decedent, the trustee of any trust in which the interest renounced exists, and no such personal representative, trustee or person shall be liable for any otherwise proper distribution or other disposition made without actual notice of the renunciation.

Unless the decedent or donee of the power has otherwise indicated, the property or interest renounced passes as if the person renouncing had predeceased the decedent, or if the person renouncing is designated to take under a power of appointment as if the person renouncing had predeceased the donee of the power. A future interest that takes effect in possession or enjoyment after the termination of the estate or interest renounced takes effect as if the person renouncing had predeceased the decedent or the donee of the power. In every case the renunciation relates back for all purposes to the date of death of the decedent or the donee, as the case may be.
(4) The right to renounce property or an interest therein is barred by:

Assignment, conveyance, encumbrance, pledge or transfer of property therein or any contract therefor;

Written waiver of the right to renounce; or

Sale or other disposition of property pursuant to judicial process, made before the renunciation is effective.

(5) The right to renounce granted by this section exists irrespective of any limitation on the interest of the person renouncing in the nature of a spendthrift provision or similar restriction.

(6) The renunciation or the written waiver of the right to renounce is binding upon the person renouncing or person waiving and all persons claiming through or under him.

(7) This section does not abridge the right of any person to assign, convey, release or renounce any property or an interest therein arising under any other statute.

(8) In clarification and amplification of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and to make clear the existing terms thereof, a renunciation may be made by an agent appointed under a power of attorney, by a conservator or guardian on behalf of an incapacitated person, or by the personal representative or administrator of a deceased person. The ability to renounce on behalf of the person does not need to be specifically set forth in a power of attorney if the power is general in nature.

(9) The due date for filing a timely disclaimer under subsection (2) of this section, where the decedent died after December 31, 2009, but before December 17, 2010, shall be not earlier than September 19, 2011.

§ 15-2-802. Effect of divorce, annulment, and decree of separation.

An individual who is divorced from the decedent or whose marriage to the decedent has been annulled is not a surviving spouse unless, by virtue of a subsequent marriage, he is married to the decedent at the time of death. A decree of separation which does not terminate the status of husband and wife is not a divorce for purposes of this section.

For purposes of parts 1, 2, 3 and 4 of this chapter and of section 15-3-203[, Idaho Code,] of this code, a surviving spouse does not include:

An individual who obtains or consents to a final decree or judgment of divorce from the decedent or an annulment of their marriage, which decree or judgment is not recognized as valid in this state, unless they subsequently participate in a marriage ceremony purporting to marry each to the other, or live together as man and wife;

An individual who, following an invalid decree or judgment of divorce or annulment obtained by the decedent, participates in a marriage ceremony with a third person; or

An individual who was a party to a valid proceeding concluded by an order purporting to terminate all marital property rights.

§ 15-2-803. Effect of homicide on distribution at death.

“Slayer” shall mean any person who participates, either as principal or as an accessory before the fact, in the wilful and unlawful killing of any other person.
(a)(1) “Slayer” shall mean any person who participates, either as principal or as an accessory before the fact, in the wilful and unlawful killing of any other person.

“Decedent” shall mean any person whose life is so taken.

“Property” shall include any real and personal property and any right or interest therein.

No slayer shall in any way acquire any property or receive any benefit as a result of the death of the decedent, but such property shall pass as provided in the sections [subsections] following.

The slayer shall be deemed to have predeceased the decedent as to property which would have passed from the decedent or his estate to the slayer under the statutes of descent and distribution or have been acquired by statutory right as surviving spouse or under any agreement made with the decedent.

Property which would have passed to or for the benefit of the slayer by devise or legacy from the decedent shall be distributed as if he had predeceased the decedent.

Any community property which would have passed to or for the benefit of the slayer by devise, legacy or intestate succession from the decedent shall be distributed as if he had predeceased the decedent.

Property in which the slayer holds a reversion of vested remainder and would have obtained the right of present possession upon the death of the decedent shall pass to the estate of the decedent during the period of the life expectancy of decedent; if he held the particular estate or if the particular estate is held by a third person it shall remain in his hands for such period.

Any interest in property whether vested or not, held by the slayer, subject to be divested, diminished in any way or extinguished, if the decedent survives him or lives to a certain age, shall be held by the slayer during his lifetime or until the decedent would have reached such age, but shall then pass as if the decedent had died immediately thereafter.

As to any contingent remainder or executory or other future interest held by the slayer, subject to become vested in him or increased in any way for him upon the condition of the death of the decedent:

If the interest would not have become vested or increased if he had predeceased the decedent, he shall be deemed to have so predeceased the decedent.

In any case the interest shall not be vested or increased during period of the life expectancy of the decedent.

Property appointed by the will of the decedent to or for the benefit of the slayer shall be distributed as if the slayer had predeceased the decedent.
(i)(1) Property appointed by the will of the decedent to or for the benefit of the slayer shall be distributed as if the slayer had predeceased the decedent.

Property held either presently or in remainder by the slayer, subject to be divested by the exercise by the decedent of a power of revocation or a general power of appointment shall pass to the estate of the decedent, and property so held by the slayer, subject to be divested by the exercise by the decedent of a power of appointment to a particular person or persons or to a class of persons, shall pass to such person or persons, or in equal shares to the members of such class of persons, exclusive of the slayer.

Insurance proceeds payable to the slayer as the beneficiary or assignee of any policy or certificate of insurance on the life of the decedent, or as the survivor of a joint life policy, shall be paid instead to the estate of the decedent, unless the policy or certificate designate [designates] some person other than the slayer or his estate as secondary beneficiary to him and in which case such proceeds shall be paid to such secondary beneficiary in accordance with the applicable terms of the policy.
(2) If the decedent is beneficiary or assignee of any policy or certificate of insurance on the life of the slayer, the proceeds shall be paid to the estate of the decedent upon the death of the slayer, unless the policy names some person other than the slayer or his estate as secondary beneficiary, or unless the slayer by naming a new beneficiary or assigning the policy performs an act which would have deprived the decedent of his interest in the policy if he had been living.
(j)(1) Insurance proceeds payable to the slayer as the beneficiary or assignee of any policy or certificate of insurance on the life of the decedent, or as the survivor of a joint life policy, shall be paid instead to the estate of the decedent, unless the policy or certificate designate [designates] some person other than the slayer or his estate as secondary beneficiary to him and in which case such proceeds shall be paid to such secondary beneficiary in accordance with the applicable terms of the policy.
(2) If the decedent is beneficiary or assignee of any policy or certificate of insurance on the life of the slayer, the proceeds shall be paid to the estate of the decedent upon the death of the slayer, unless the policy names some person other than the slayer or his estate as secondary beneficiary, or unless the slayer by naming a new beneficiary or assigning the policy performs an act which would have deprived the decedent of his interest in the policy if he had been living.

Any insurance company making payment according to the terms of its policy or any bank or other person performing an obligation for the slayer as one of several joint obligees shall not be subjected to additional liability by the terms of this Part if such payment or performance is made without written notice, at its home office or at an individual’s home or business address, of the killing by a slayer.

The provisions of this Part shall not affect the rights of any person who, before the interests of the slayer have been adjudicated, purchases or has agreed to purchase, from the slayer for value and without notice, property which the slayer would have acquired except for the terms of this Part, but all proceeds received by the slayer from such sale shall be held by him in trust for the persons entitled to the property under the provisions of this Part, and the slayer shall also be liable both for any portion of such proceeds which he may have dissipated and for any difference between the actual value of the property and the amount of such proceeds.

The record of his conviction of having participated in the wilful and unlawful killing of the decedent shall be admissible in evidence against a claimant of property in any civil action arising under this Part.

This section shall not be considered penal in nature, but shall be construed broadly in order to effect the policy of this state that no person shall be allowed to profit by his own wrong, wherever committed.

§ 15-2-804. Revocation of probate and nonprobate transfers by divorce — No revocation by other changes of circumstances.

Definitions. In this section:

“Disposition or appointment of property” includes a transfer of an item of property or any other benefit to a beneficiary designated in a governing instrument.

“Divorce or annulment” means any divorce or annulment, or any dissolution or declaration of invalidity of a marriage, that would exclude the spouse as a surviving spouse within the meaning of section 15-2-802, Idaho Code. A decree of separation that does not terminate the status of husband and wife is not a divorce for the purposes of this section.

“Divorced individual” includes an individual whose marriage has been annulled.

“Governing instrument” means a governing instrument executed by the divorced individual before the divorce or annulment of his marriage to his former spouse.

“Relative of the divorced individual’s former spouse” means an individual who is related to the divorced individual’s former spouse by blood, adoption or affinity and who, after the divorce or annulment, is not related to the divorced individual by blood, adoption or affinity.

“Revocable,” with respect to a disposition, appointment, provision or nomination, means one under which the divorced individual, at the time of the divorce or annulment, was alone empowered, by law or under the governing instrument, to cancel the designation in favor of his former spouse or former spouse’s relative, whether or not the divorced individual was then empowered to designate himself in place of his former spouse or in place of his former spouse’s relative and whether or not the divorced individual then had the capacity to exercise the power.

Revocation Upon Divorce. Except as provided by the express terms of a governing instrument, a court order or a contract relating to the division of the marital estate made between the divorced individuals before or after the marriage, divorce or annulment, a divorce or annulment of a marriage:

Revokes any revocable:

Disposition or appointment of property made by a divorced individual to his or her former spouse in a governing instrument and any disposition or appointment created by law or in a governing instrument to a relative of the divorced individual’s former spouse;

Provision in a governing instrument conferring a general or nongeneral power of appointment on the divorced individual’s former spouse or on a relative of the divorced individual’s former spouse; and

Nomination in a governing instrument, nominating a divorced individual’s former spouse or a relative of the divorced individual’s former spouse to serve in any fiduciary or representative capacity, including a personal representative, executor, trustee, conservator, agent or guardian; and

Severs the interests of the former spouses in property held by them at the time of the divorce or annulment as joint tenants with the right of survivorship transforming the interests of the former spouses into equal tenancies in common.

Effect of Severance. A severance under subsection (b)(2) of this section does not affect any third-party interest in property acquired for value and in good faith reliance on an apparent title by survivorship in the survivor of the former spouses unless a writing declaring the severance has been noted, registered, filed or recorded in records appropriate to the kind and location of the property, which records are relied upon, in the ordinary course of transactions involving such property, as evidence of ownership.

Effect of Revocation. Provisions of a governing instrument are given effect as if the former spouse and relatives of the former spouse disclaimed all provisions revoked by this section or, in the case of a revoked nomination in a fiduciary or representative capacity, as if the former spouse and relatives of the former spouse died immediately before the divorce or annulment.

Revival. Provisions revoked solely by this section are revived by the divorced individual’s remarriage to the former spouse or by the divorce or annulment being set aside.

No Revocation for Other Change of Circumstances. No change of circumstances other than as described in this section and in section 15-2-803 effects a revocation.

Protection of Payors and Other Third Parties.

A payor or other third party is not liable for having made a payment or transferred an item of property or any other benefit to a beneficiary designated in a governing instrument affected by a divorce, annulment or remarriage, or for having taken any other action in good faith reliance on the validity of the governing instrument, before the payor or other third party received written notice of the divorce, annulment or remarriage. A payor or other third party is liable for a payment made or other action taken after the payor or other third party received written notice of a claimed forfeiture or revocation under this section.

Written notice of the divorce, annulment or remarriage under paragraph (1) of this subsection must be mailed to the payor’s or other third party’s main office or home by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, or served upon the payor or other third party in the same manner as a summons in a civil action. Upon receipt of written notice of the divorce, annulment or remarriage, a payor or other third party may pay any amount owed or transfer or deposit any item of property held by it to or with the court having jurisdiction of the probate proceedings relating to the decedent’s estate or, if no proceedings have been commenced, to or with the court having jurisdiction of probate proceedings relating to decedents’ estates located in the county of the decedent’s residence. The court shall hold the funds or item of property and, upon its determination under this section, shall order disbursement or transfer in accordance with the determination. Payments, transfers or deposits made to or with the court discharge the payor or other third party from all claims for the value of amounts paid to or items of property transferred to or deposited with the court.

Protection of Bona Fide Purchasers — Personal Liability of Recipient.

A person who purchases property from a former spouse, relative of a former spouse, or any other person for value and without notice, or who receives from a former spouse, relative of a former spouse, or any other person a payment or other item of property in partial or full satisfaction of a legally enforceable obligation, is neither obligated under this section to return the payment, item of property or benefit, nor is liable under this section for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit. But a former spouse, relative of a former spouse, or other person who, not for value, received a payment, item of property or any other benefit to which that person is not entitled under this section is obligated to return the payment, item of property or benefit, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit, to the person who is entitled to it under this section.